fr: Type de fermeture du harnais: Boucle de siège; Passe-fil; La boucle du crochet; Boucle d'ouverture; Fermeture éclair; Autre
tr: Kemer kapatma türü: Çekyat tokası; Gromet; Cırt cırtlı; Yandan çıkarılabilir toka; Fermuar; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de fecho de arnês: Fivela de assento rebatível; Ilhó; Gancho; Fivela de abertura lateral; Fecho; Outro
nb: Type selelukking: Slippsetespenne; Malje; Krok og løkke; Sideklikkspenne; Glidelås; Annet
ro-RO: Tip închidere ham: Cataramă pentru scaun; Capse; Scai; Cataramă cu eliberare laterală; Fermoar; Altele
it: Tipo di chiusura dell’imbracatura: Fibbia del sedile abbassabile; Occhiello; Gancio e anello; Fibbia a sgancio laterale; Zipper; Altro
hu: Heveder záródásának típusa: Beülőheveder-csat; Fűzőkarika; Tépőzár; Oldalsó kioldócsat; Cipzár; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип закопчаване с колани: Катарама за падаща седалка; Релса; Кука и примка; Странична катарама за освобождаване; Цип; Други
sk-SK: Typ zapínania postroja: Sklopná spona sedadla; Priechodka; Suchý zips; Spona na bočné zapínanie; Zips; Iné
cs: Typ zapínání postroje: Přezka spouštěcího sedáku; Průchodka; Suchý zip; Boční rozepínací přezka; Zip; Jiné
zh-TW: 安全帶閉合類型: 安全吊帶扣環; 索環; 鉤環; 旁開扣; 拉鍊; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta zapiranja pasu: Spuščena zaponka za sedež; Rinke; Kavelj in zanka; Zaponka za hitro sprostitev; Zadrga; Drugo
en: Harness closure type: Drop seat buckle; Grommet; Hook & loop; Side release buckle; Zipper; Other
ja: ハーネス留め具の種類: ドロップシートバックル; グロメット; フック＆ループ; サイドリリースバックル; ジッパー; その他
es: Tipo de cierre del arnés: Hebilla del asiento abatible; Ojal; Velcro; Hebilla de liberación lateral; Cremallera; Otros
nl: Sluitingstype harnas: Stoelgesp; Oogje; Klittenband; Gesp met zijsluiting; Ritssluiting; Andere
th: ประเภทของสายรัดแบบตะขอ: ตัวล็อกเอว; ตาไก่; ตะขอและห่วง; หัวเข็มขัดแบบปลดด้านข้าง; ซิป; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Apraišų užsegimo tipas: Nuleidžiama sėdynės sagtis; Žiedas; Kabliukas; Šoninio atsegimo sagtis; Užtrauktukas; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta zakopčavanja pojasa: Spuštena kopča sjedala; Uvodnica; Čičak-traka; Bočna kopča za otpuštanje; Patentni zatvarač; Ostalo
da: Selelukningstype: Drop-sædespænde; Tylle; Burrebånd; Sideudløserspænde; Lynlås; Andet
el: Τύπος κλεισίματος ιμάντα: Πόρπη πτώσης καθίσματος; Ροδέλα; Αγκράφα και θηλιά; Πλαϊνή πόρπη απελευθέρωσης; Φερμουάρ; Άλλο
fi: Valjaiden sulkemistyyppi: Pudotusistuinsolki; Tiiviste; Tarranauha; Sivulta avattava solki; Vetoketju; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de fecho do arnês: Fivela de assento rebatível; Ilhó; Fecho gancho e laço; Fivela de liberação lateral; Zíper; Outro
vi: Loại dây đóng: Khóa đùi; Vòng đệm; Gai dính; Khóa bấm nhựa bên; Chân may khóa kéo; Khác
sv: Stängningstyp för sele: Fällbart säte med spänne; Öljett; Krok & slinga; Snabbspänne på sidan; Dragkedja; Övrigt
ru: Тип застежки в страховочной системе: Пряжка ремня безопасности; Люверс; Липучка; Боковая застежка-пряжка; Молния; Другой
de: Art des Gurtverschlusses: Drop-Sitzgurt; Öse; Klettband; Seitensteckschnalle; Reißverschluss; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 安全带闭合类型: 下降式座椅扣; 金属扣眼; 钩环; 旁开扣; 拉链; 其他
ko: 하네스 폐쇄 유형: 드롭 시트 버클; 그로밋; 후크 앤 루프; 측면 릴리스 버클; 지퍼; 기타
pl: Typ zamknięcia uprzęży: Klamra opuszczanego siedziska; Przelotka; Haczyk i pętelka; Klamra wypinająca boczna; Zamek błyskawiczny; Inne